Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 113 of Title 76, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “advertise” means a media


communication, including through television, radio, print, the


Internet, digital or electronic media, product placement, promotion


by an influencer in exchange for compensation, or other manner of


paid promotion a vaccine manufacturer purchases to promote the


manufacturer’s vaccine. The term does not include:


1. Any discussion between a health care provider and the


provider’s patient or written materials a health care provider


provides to a patient concerning a vaccine; or

Req. No. 2990 Page 1


2. Any posters, decorations, or other materials or promotional


items concerning a vaccine that are displayed in or made available


by a health care facility, health care provider’s office, or other


clinical setting.


B. A vaccine manufacturer is liable to an individual if the


manufacturer advertises a vaccine in this state and the advertised


vaccine causes harm or injury to the individual.


C. Notwithstanding any other law, an individual may bring an


action under this section not later than the third anniversary of


the date the cause of action accrues.


D. A court shall award a claimant who prevails in an action


brought under this section actual damages, court costs, and


reasonable attorney fees incurred in bringing the action.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2990 DC 1/8/2026 6:34:31 PM

















Req. No. 2990 Page 2